Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.018

Fees to state court, administrative office of the courts—Appellate review fee and surcharge—Variable fee for copies and reports.

(1) State revenue collected by county clerks under subsection (2) of this section must be transmitted to the appropriate state court. The administrative office of the courts shall retain fees collected under subsection (3) of this section.

(2) For appellate review under RAP 5.1(b), two hundred fifty dollars must be charged, except that no fee may be charged under this section for a case transferred from the superior court to the court of appeals pursuant to RCW 34.05.518 or 36.70C.150.

(3) For all copies and reports produced by the administrative office of the courts as permitted under RCW 2.68.020 and supreme court policy, a variable fee must be charged.

(4) In addition to the fee established under subsection (2) of this section, a surcharge of forty dollars is established for appellate review. The county clerk shall transmit seventy-five percent of this surcharge to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial stabilization trust account and twenty-five percent must be retained by the county.

[ 2021 c 305 s 4; 2021 c 303 s 2; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 2; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 2; 2012 c 199 s 2; 2011 1st sp.s. c 44 s 3; 2009 c 572 s 3; 2005 c 282 s 43; 1995 c 292 s 15.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2021 c 303 s 2 and by 2021 c 305 s 4, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2021 c 305: See note following RCW 36.70C.150.

Effective date—2021 c 303: See note following RCW 3.62.060.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 2: See note following RCW 3.62.060.

Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 3.62.060.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 44: See note following RCW 3.62.020.

Effective date—2009 c 572: See note following RCW 43.79.505.